Hawaii statutes.
§180-2 General powers and duties of
department. The department of land and natural resources shall keep a
record of its official actions and may perform acts and adopt rules as may be
necessary for the execution of its functions under this chapter. It may call
upon the attorney general for legal services or employ its own counsel in
conformity with section 28-8.3. It may delegate to any member, agent, or
employee, powers and duties as it may deem proper. Upon request of the
department, other agencies of the state government, insofar as available
appropriations and resources will permit, shall assign staff members or
personnel to the department, and make reports, surveys, or studies as the
department may request. [L 1947, c 191, pt of §4; RL 1955, §28-5; am L Sp 1959
2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132, §2; am L 1967, c 145, §§1, 2; HRS §180-2; am L
Sp 1993, c 8, §53; am L 2015, c 35, §36]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next